Mississippi, session 2026, HB4125.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Omar Travis of Hinds County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector as a result of his conviction on March 6, 1991, in Hinds County on the charge of Burglary-Residential with CT. I, II, III, IV running concurrent to each other, and sentenced to serve five (5) years within the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections. On February 2, 2009, he was sentenced for an out-of-state charge of Burglary, for which he was sentenced to probation for four (4) years, nine (9) months and two (2) days.  On March 14, 2016, he was sentenced in Rankin County Circuit Court for Receiving Stolen Property, for ten (10) years to serve within the Mississippi Department of Corrections.  He was released to parole on February 14, 2018, and was discharged on February 1, 2021. The Legislature is informed that he has since conducted himself as a law-abiding citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.